Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7065.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-62 of the General Laws entitled "Truth in Food Disclosure Law"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
23-62-3. Reduction in added sugar in liquid beverages.
On and after January 1, 2030, all liquid beverages sold for consumption in Rhode Island
shall reduce the total amount of added sugars in the liquid beverage by fifty percent (50%) of the
added sugars content in that beverage as of July 1, 2026. As used herein, the term "added sugars"
has the same meaning as defined by the Food and Drug Administration rules on food labeling (21
CFR Part 101); provided, the amount of added sugars content shall be listed on the liquid beverage
container as provided by state and federal law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect January 1, 2030.
========
LC003941
========